trunk/files/dict/fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX b0 N 242
SFX b0 er er er
SFX b0 er ant [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çant cer
SFX b0 er é er
SFX b0 ecer èce ecer
SFX b0 emer ème emer
SFX b0 ener ène ener
SFX b0 eper èpe eper
SFX b0 erer ère erer
SFX b0 eser èse eser
SFX b0 ever ève ever
SFX b0 evrer èvre evrer
SFX b0 eter ète eter
SFX b0 eler èle eler
SFX b0 ecer èces ecer
SFX b0 emer èmes emer
SFX b0 ener ènes ener
SFX b0 eper èpes eper
SFX b0 erer ères erer
SFX b0 eser èses eser
SFX b0 ever èves ever
SFX b0 evrer èvres evrer
SFX b0 eter ètes eter
SFX b0 eler èles eler
SFX b0 ecer èce ecer
SFX b0 emer ème emer
SFX b0 ener ène ener
SFX b0 eper èpe eper
SFX b0 erer ère erer
SFX b0 eser èse eser
SFX b0 ever ève ever
SFX b0 evrer èvre evrer
SFX b0 eter ète eter
SFX b0 eler èle eler
SFX b0 er ons [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çons cer
SFX b0 er ez er
SFX b0 ecer ècent ecer
SFX b0 emer èment emer
SFX b0 ener ènent ener
SFX b0 eper èpent eper
SFX b0 erer èrent erer
SFX b0 eser èsent eser
SFX b0 ever èvent ever
SFX b0 evrer èvrent evrer
SFX b0 eter ètent eter
SFX b0 eler èlent eler
SFX b0 er ais [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çais cer
SFX b0 er ais [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çais cer
SFX b0 er ait [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çait cer
SFX b0 er ions er
SFX b0 er iez er
SFX b0 er aient [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çaient cer
SFX b0 er ai [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çai cer
SFX b0 er as [^c]er
SFX b0 cer ças cer
SFX b0 er a [^c]er
SFX b0 cer ça cer
SFX b0 er âmes [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çâmes cer
SFX b0 er âtes [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çâtes cer
SFX b0 er èrent er
SFX b0 ecer ècerai ecer
SFX b0 emer èmerai emer
SFX b0 ener ènerai ener
SFX b0 eper èperai eper
SFX b0 erer èrerai erer
SFX b0 eser èserai eser
SFX b0 ever èverai ever
SFX b0 evrer èvrerai evrer
SFX b0 eter èterai eter
SFX b0 eler èlerai eler
SFX b0 ecer èceras ecer
SFX b0 emer èmeras emer
SFX b0 ener èneras ener
SFX b0 eper èperas eper
SFX b0 erer èreras erer
SFX b0 eser èseras eser
SFX b0 ever èveras ever
SFX b0 evrer èvreras evrer
SFX b0 eter èteras eter
SFX b0 eler èleras eler
SFX b0 ecer ècera ecer
SFX b0 emer èmera emer
SFX b0 ener ènera ener
SFX b0 eper èpera eper
SFX b0 erer èrera erer
SFX b0 eser èsera eser
SFX b0 ever èvera ever
SFX b0 evrer èvrera evrer
SFX b0 eter ètera eter
SFX b0 eler èlera eler
SFX b0 ecer ècerons ecer
SFX b0 emer èmerons emer
SFX b0 ener ènerons ener
SFX b0 eper èperons eper
SFX b0 erer èrerons erer
SFX b0 eser èserons eser
SFX b0 ever èverons ever
SFX b0 evrer èvrerons evrer
SFX b0 eter èterons eter
SFX b0 eler èlerons eler
SFX b0 ecer ècerez ecer
SFX b0 emer èmerez emer
SFX b0 ener ènerez ener
SFX b0 eper èperez eper
SFX b0 erer èrerez erer
SFX b0 eser èserez eser
SFX b0 ever èverez ever
SFX b0 evrer èvrerez evrer
SFX b0 eter èterez eter
SFX b0 eler èlerez eler
SFX b0 ecer èceront ecer
SFX b0 emer èmeront emer
SFX b0 ener èneront ener
SFX b0 eper èperont eper
SFX b0 erer èreront erer
SFX b0 eser èseront eser
SFX b0 ever èveront ever
SFX b0 evrer èvreront evrer
SFX b0 eter èteront eter
SFX b0 eler èleront eler
SFX b0 ecer ècerais ecer
SFX b0 emer èmerais emer
SFX b0 ener ènerais ener
SFX b0 eper èperais eper
SFX b0 erer èrerais erer
SFX b0 eser èserais eser
SFX b0 ever èverais ever
SFX b0 evrer èvrerais evrer
SFX b0 eter èterais eter
SFX b0 eler èlerais eler
SFX b0 ecer ècerais ecer
SFX b0 emer èmerais emer
SFX b0 ener ènerais ener
SFX b0 eper èperais eper
SFX b0 erer èrerais erer
SFX b0 eser èserais eser
SFX b0 ever èverais ever
SFX b0 evrer èvrerais evrer
SFX b0 eter èterais eter
SFX b0 eler èlerais eler
SFX b0 ecer ècerait ecer
SFX b0 emer èmerait emer
SFX b0 ener ènerait ener
SFX b0 eper èperait eper
SFX b0 erer èrerait erer
SFX b0 eser èserait eser
SFX b0 ever èverait ever
SFX b0 evrer èvrerait evrer
SFX b0 eter èterait eter
SFX b0 eler èlerait eler
SFX b0 ecer ècerions ecer
SFX b0 emer èmerions emer
SFX b0 ener ènerions ener
SFX b0 eper èperions eper
SFX b0 erer èrerions erer
SFX b0 eser èserions eser
SFX b0 ever èverions ever
SFX b0 evrer èvrerions evrer
SFX b0 eter èterions eter
SFX b0 eler èlerions eler
SFX b0 ecer èceriez ecer
SFX b0 emer èmeriez emer
SFX b0 ener èneriez ener
SFX b0 eper èperiez eper
SFX b0 erer èreriez erer
SFX b0 eser èseriez eser
SFX b0 ever èveriez ever
SFX b0 evrer èvreriez evrer
SFX b0 eter èteriez eter
SFX b0 eler èleriez eler
SFX b0 ecer èceraient ecer
SFX b0 emer èmeraient emer
SFX b0 ener èneraient ener
SFX b0 eper èperaient eper
SFX b0 erer èreraient erer
SFX b0 eser èseraient eser
SFX b0 ever èveraient ever
SFX b0 evrer èvreraient evrer
SFX b0 eter èteraient eter
SFX b0 eler èleraient eler
SFX b0 ecer èce ecer
SFX b0 emer ème emer
SFX b0 ener ène ener
SFX b0 eper èpe eper
SFX b0 erer ère erer
SFX b0 eser èse eser
SFX b0 ever ève ever
SFX b0 evrer èvre evrer
SFX b0 eter ète eter
SFX b0 eler èle eler
SFX b0 ecer èces ecer
SFX b0 emer èmes emer
SFX b0 ener ènes ener
SFX b0 eper èpes eper
SFX b0 erer ères erer
SFX b0 eser èses eser
SFX b0 ever èves ever
SFX b0 evrer èvres evrer
SFX b0 eter ètes eter
SFX b0 eler èles eler
SFX b0 ecer èce ecer
SFX b0 emer ème emer
SFX b0 ener ène ener
SFX b0 eper èpe eper
SFX b0 erer ère erer
SFX b0 eser èse eser
SFX b0 ever ève ever
SFX b0 evrer èvre evrer
SFX b0 eter ète eter
SFX b0 eler èle eler
SFX b0 er ions er
SFX b0 er iez er
SFX b0 ecer ècent ecer
SFX b0 emer èment emer
SFX b0 ener ènent ener
SFX b0 eper èpent eper
SFX b0 erer èrent erer
SFX b0 eser èsent eser
SFX b0 ever èvent ever
SFX b0 evrer èvrent evrer
SFX b0 eter ètent eter
SFX b0 eler èlent eler
SFX b0 er asse [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çasse cer
SFX b0 er asses [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çasses cer
SFX b0 er ât [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çât cer
SFX b0 er assions [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çassions cer
SFX b0 er assiez [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çassiez cer
SFX b0 er assent [^c]er
SFX b0 cer çassent cer
